Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1042
Voting systems; acquisition authorized; debt; tax levy; payment.

The governing body of any county may purchase, lease, lease-purchase, rent, or contract for voting systems approved by the Secretary of State to be used in all elections. The governing body of any county may issue bonds, certificates of indebtedness, or other obligations or levy for the purpose of acquiring voting systems. Any excess amounts levied and collected shall revert to the county general fund. Any bonds, certificates, or other obligations may be issued with or without interest and may be payable at such time or times as the governing body may determine but shall not be issued or sold at less than par. The governing body of the county may provide for installment payments which extend over a period of more than one year notwithstanding sections 23-132 and 23-916.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 336;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 53;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 38.